Mississippi, session 2026, HB349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 41-21-77, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 41-21-77.  * * *(1)  If admission is ordered at a treatment facility, the sheriff, his or her deputy or any other person appointed or authorized by the court shall immediately deliver the respondent to the director of the appropriate facility.  Neither the Board of Mental Health or its members, nor the Department of Mental Health or its related facilities, nor any employee of the Department of Mental Health or its related facilities, shall be appointed, authorized or ordered to deliver the respondent for treatment, and no person shall be so delivered or admitted until the director of the admitting institution determines that facilities and services are available.  Persons who have been ordered committed and are awaiting admission may be given any such treatment in the facility by a licensed physician as is indicated by standard medical practice.  Any county facility used for providing housing, maintenance and medical treatment for involuntarily committed persons pending their transportation and admission to a state treatment facility shall be certified by the State Department of Mental Health under the provisions of Section 41-4-7(kk).  No person shall be delivered or admitted to any non-Department of Mental Health treatment facility unless the treatment facility is licensed and/or certified to provide the appropriate level of psychiatric care for persons with mental illness.  It is the intent of this Legislature that county-owned hospitals work with regional community mental health/intellectual disability centers in providing care to local patients.  The clerk shall provide the director of the admitting institution with a certified copy of the court order, a certified copy of the appointed examiners' certificates, a certified copy of the affidavit, and any other information available concerning the physical and mental condition of the respondent.  Upon notification from the United States Veterans Administration or other agency of the United States government, that facilities are available and the respondent is eligible for care and treatment in those facilities, the court may enter an order for delivery of the respondent to or retention by the Veterans Administration or other agency of the United States government, and, in those cases the chief officer to whom the respondent is so delivered or by whom he is retained shall, with respect to the respondent, be vested with the same powers as the director of the Mississippi State Hospital at Whitfield, or the East Mississippi State Hospital at Meridian, with respect to retention and discharge of the respondent. * * * (2)  (a)  When admission to a treatment facility is ordered by the court, the chancery clerk shall make record of the admission. Each chancery clerk shall maintain a record of the number of persons ordered by the court to be admitted to a treatment facility, the number of hearings held by the court to determine whether a person should be admitted to a treatment facility and the number of affidavits filed to admit a person to a treatment facility under Section 41‑21‑61 * * *etc et. seq. (b) The chancery clerk shall maintain a record each time such clerk receives a denial for admission to a community mental health center crisis stabilization bed, the reason provided to the clerk for such denial, and the subsequent action taken by the clerk upon receiving the denial. (c) Each chancery clerk shall provide the records required by paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection (2) to the Department of Mental Health within thirty (30) days of the end of each calendar quarter.  Within sixty (60) days of receipt of the chancery clerk records, the Department of Mental Health shall provide a summary to the Chairpersons of the Appropriations, Public Health and Judiciary A and B Committees for the Mississippi House of Representatives and the Mississippi Senate, the Coordinator of Mental Health and the President of the Mississippi Association of Community Mental Health Centers. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.